Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8278.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-7-28 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-7 entitled "Collection of
Taxes Generally" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-7-28. Glocester, Coventry and Burrillville tax lien on mobile or manufactured
home in the town Glocester, Coventry, Burrillville and Smithfield tax lien on mobile or
manufactured home in the town.
(a) Taxes assessed against any person in the towns of Glocester, Coventry, and Burrillville
and Smithfield for either a mobile or manufactured home shall constitute a lien on the mobile or
manufactured home. The lien shall arise and attach as of the date of assessment of the taxes, as
defined in § 44-5-1.
(b) The lien shall terminate at the expiration of twenty (20) years. The lien shall be superior
to any other lien, encumbrance, or interest in the mobile or manufactured home whether by way of
attachment or otherwise.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005947
========